Tennessee, session 114, HB0551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 21, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The human rights commission is urged to study problems of discrimination
against healthcare providers in this state because of their decision to decline to
participate in a healthcare service on the basis of religious, moral, or ethical beliefs. The
commission shall include in an annual report submitted pursuant to § 4-21-203(c)(10) its
findings and recommendations from any such study.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0551
001282
- 1 -